New York, session 2025-2026, A778.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 267-c to read as follows: 3 § 267-c. Information concerning intrauterine devices. 1. The depart- 4 ment shall develop an informational pamphlet for individuals considering 5 intrauterine devices. Such pamphlet shall include, but shall not be 6 limited to, information concerning: 7 (a) the types of intrauterine devices available, their use in pregnan- 8 cy prevention and the management of medical conditions, and how they 9 differ from each other; 10 (b) the potential risks and side effects associated with intrauterine 11 devices; 12 (c) the insertion and removal process of intrauterine devices, includ- 13 ing the potential for pain during and after the procedure and medica- 14 tions that may be used to prevent or manage such pain; 15 (d) the recovery process following the insertion of an intrauterine 16 device; 17 (e) the effectiveness of intrauterine devices; and 18 (f) alternative contraceptive methods available if an individual 19 determines an intrauterine device is not appropriate for such individ- 20 ual. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02572-03-5 A. 778--A 2 1 2. Such informational pamphlet shall be written in layperson's 2 language and shall be made available in English and the six most common 3 non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited English profi- 4 ciency in New York state as based on the most recent census. 5 3. Such informational pamphlet shall be made available on the depart- 6 ment's website as a printable file and may also be made available for 7 order as a printed deliverable on the department's website. 8 4. Practitioners shall distribute such informational pamphlet to 9 patients seeking contraceptives or interested in discussing contracep- 10 tive methods. 11 5. For purposes of this section, "practitioner" means a health care 12 professional licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to practice 13 under the education law, acting within the scope of practice. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law.